Arifureta Shokugyou de Sekai Saikyou (WN) Chapter 101-200

Chapter 99

In a room where the only light source was produced by the moonlight rays, causing a contrast of black and white from the narrow grate window.



A simple and plain room can be seen. It’s only around 6 tatami mats in size with a small desk, chair, wooden bed, and a simple toilet. If compared to Earth’s prison cells, it’s obvious that this is much worst.



In such a bad prison, sitting on the bed in the corner, is Hatanaka Aiko who is currently burying her face in her knees.



It’s been 3 days since Aiko was brought to this room.



Due to the bracelet artifact worn on her wrist, Aiko could not use magic. Still, though she tried to escape at first, as expected, it wasn’t possible to pry open a steel door with her physical strength alone, moreover, the opening of the grate window is only big enough for one of her arms to just barely pass through.



Even then, the current rooms position is at the very top of an expensive temple, it is the [Kamiyama]*God’s Mountain* temple, even though it should be impossible to reach the ground safely, there are members of the church standing on watch.



In such a position, while worrying about her students safety, Aiko who cannot do anything is dejected and gloomy, Her already small body stature becomes even smaller on the bed.



[.........I need to get to my students…...but how……]



Aiko while looking up muttered slightly, she remembered what the nun with the silver hair had said to her as she was kidnaped. Aiko’s thoughts, if what she heard from Hajime would become an inconvenience when told to Kouki and them, it’s obvious who the “master” that she spoke of is. And it appears that they’ve taken interest in a student as well.



Aiko’s mind became filled with unspeakable uneasiness. Recalling, the events of Ulu*Town where Hajime’s group repelled the demon army*, where one of her students lost their life, Yukitoshi Shimizu. Possibly, again, another student will…., with these thoughts in her mind Aiko became more anxious.



Being confined in this open room, she tried to think about things that she could currently do. If she settled down and look back calmly, the royal palace felt too unnatural and covered with a thick sense of incongruity. In Aiko’s mind, with a strong posture, she remembered the dangerous atmosphere that King Erihido and other leaders carried.



Surely, Aiko began to guess that the nun with silver hair had done something. She definitely said, “charm” if that was true then, surely, something along the lines of brainwashing was done.



However, at the same time, when talking with Shizuku and Ririana, such odd sense of incongruity was not there. Though becoming relieved about that, there is still a strong uneasiness built up in her chest due to being confined.



While praying for their safety, another concern was remembered. it was the words, “elimination of the irregular.” Those words were she heard just before completely losing consciousness, for some reason Aiko recalled a certain student.



The person that she owes her life to, the student that killed Yukitoshi Shimizu. While holding strong will and overpowering strength, the boy who thought seriously and listen to Aiko’s words. And, a lot of things happened, a various amount of things, deep inside, as expected deep inside, though she shouldn’t think about it, but she still ended up remembering.



The memory that she desperately tried to seal in her mind, is once again remembered, for some reason her cheeks become hot. Though Aiko was shaking her head to clear her mind of it, she begins to worry about Hajime’s safety, and carelessly muttered his name.



[......Nagumo-kun]



[Ou? what, sensei?]



[Fe!?]



From the sudden answer to her unconscious mumbling, she instinctively let out a unexpected voice. There shouldn’t be anyone else in the room, while looking throughout the room, Aiko inclining her head, [Was it a hallucination?] she said. However, Aiko was definitely not hallucinating, again, she heard the voice.



[Over here, sensei]



[Eh?]



Aiko’s body became alerted to the voice, it wasn’t a hallucination after all! Her gaze peered towards the narrow grate window. There, it was the appearance of Hajime that was peeping through from the otherside.



[Eh? Eh? Nagumo-kun? Eh? This is the top floor….of this temple….eh?]



[Ah~, yes. First of all, calm down sensei. Im almost done confirming for traps…...]



Disregarding Aiko’s confused stare, Hajime confirms whether there are any traps with his Magic Eye, then “Transmuting” was used and bright red sparks appeared, a hole big enough for one person to pass through was made and with that the invasion was complete.



The room Aiko is confined in is about 100 meters above ground level. However, he entered as if he was on solid ground! That is to say, for Hajime to casually opened a hole and walked right in, caused Aiko to stare in shock.



Hajime shows a small smile towards the amazed Aiko.



[What, is it really that surprising. Didn’t you notice that I was coming? Though I should have already cut off all traces of my presence…...I’ve lost a bit of my confidence now]



[He? Noticed? Eh?]



[No, because, you call out my name. Didn’t you sense me outside the window?]



Obviously, in order for Aiko to feel Hajime’s presence shouldn’t be possible unless “Perception” was used, but Aiko simply called out his name because of her desires, while thinking that, Aiko couldn’t say that she unconsciously muttered his name, she quickly thought that changing the topic would be the best choice.



[Um, besides that, why are you here……]



[To help, of course]



[Wa, for me? Nagumo-kun? You came all the way here to help me?]



To Aiko who began to blush and mumble strangely ~awaawa~, Hajime carefully examined her stature, surely she hasn’t already been brainwashed? Hajime thought while frowning. With a serious look in his eyes, he began to closely examine Aiko with his Magic Eye to look for signs of magic manipulation.



While walking up towards Aiko who sat on the bed, observing in great detail, Aiko started blushing a great deal and her heartbeat escalated. Anyways, the boy that she was just thinking about, came to help after hearing about her predicament, beside her on the bed at night, being watched by such an intense expression. It’s just a student and teacher, there shouldn’t be any particular problem right? Though she thought so…..Aiko wasn’t confident to say it out loud, she became stiff as she could do nothing but return the gaze that Hajime is giving her.



Hajime, thinking that it’ll be ok now that the Magic Eye didn’t pick up any kind of magic manipulation, grabs onto Aiko’s hand. He was going to remove the artifact that was binding her magic.



However, Aiko whose hand was suddenly grabbed [Hyau~!] a strange voice leaked out and she shrunk down a bit, [Stop! It’s no good! Nagumo-kun! Such thing can’t be permitted! I’m a teacher!], she began to yell.



[No, isn’t it inconvenient if your magic is sealed? Or, is there something wrong with it? Though there doesn’t seem to be any traps]



[Eh? Ah, this thing…..]



[.......what else is there]



[Ah, ahaha…...sorry. Its nothing……]



Suspicion passes, Hajime’s eyes began to show a disappointed look, Aiko tried to deceive him with a fake smile. And, changing the topic, asked how he knew where she was being locked up.



[The princess told us]



[Princess? Princess Ririna?]



[Ahh. She witnessed you being kidnapped. While judging that Amanogawa*Kouki* and them were under surveillance, she decided to escape the royal capital. Then she requested our help]



[Riri did…..then Nagumo-kun accepted her request]



[Maa~na, I seem to be responsible for this situation too…..though sensei might not have wanted to see me…...well, please endure it until we return to everybody]



After Hajime finished removing the artifact that sealed Aiko’s magic, he stood up. Aiko, predicted that Hajime’s last line was about Shimizu’s death. And, Aiko’s eyes looked straight at the dubious Hajime, then began saying what she truly felt about it.



[Not wanting to see you, there’s no such thing. You’ve come to help, I’m really glad. …...Certainly, Shimizu-kun’s situation can’t be completely forgotten, and it’s likely to never to able to forget it….still, your intentions you had when you pulled the trigger….. I think I understand them. I don’t hold a grudge against you, I don’t hate you either]



[.......Sensei]



To the wide eyed Hajime, Aiko revealed an anxious smile with gentleness.



[At that time, because I couldn’t say it properly…..now, please let me say it. ….Thank you for helping me. I’m sorry for making you pull the trigger]



[.........]



Hajime had a wry smile because it appears that Yue was correct, still, it’s a fact that I’ve caused Aiko pain, however he couldn’t bring it up.



[I, I only did what I wanted to do. Though I’ll receive your gratitude, you don’t have to apologize. Rather than that, lets leave soon. The princess should have reached Amanogawa and the rest already. After we join up with them, it’s necessary to talk about the future]



[I understand. …..Nagumo-kun, please be careful. The church sees you as a heretic. And, to the one that kidnapped me, you are probably…..]



[I know. Either way, after I deliver you, I’ll be taking care of the unfinished business, probably, at that time, the church and I will clash against one another. ….I’ve already prepared for it though]



Hajime nodded to Aiko with a gaze of strong will. Aiko’s cheek becomes hot again due to the gaze, Aiko tried to word out her concerns once more.



but, at that time, a roaring sound of something breaking was heard from afar, the air also trembled a bit.



With that Aiko’s body stiffens up and turns her eyes towards Hajime, Hajime was staring out and concentrating on something in the far distance. At that moment, Hajime gained information from Yue’s group who’s on the ground.



[Che, with this timing. …..well, in a sense it’s convenient…...]



After a while, Hajime glances back at Aiko while clicking his tongue. Though Aiko doesn’t know that Hajime has telepathy, but because she knew he had a lot of artifacts, she guessed that he learned something, her glance gave off the impression of wanting to know what was going on.



[Sensei, it’s a surprise attack from the Majinzoku*<-Devils*. It seems that sound just now was the outer barrier covering the kingdom being broken to pieces]



[A surprise attack from the Majinzoku!? That means…..]



[Ahh, right now, the Hairihi Kingdom is being invaded. I’ve just gained information from my companions through “Telepathy”. It appears that the Majinzoku also brought along a large army of demons. It’s a complete surprise attack]



To Hajime’s briefing, Aiko’s face becomes pale, [That can’t be], was leaked out while shaking her head.



Thats true. First of all, its impossible to not notice an invasion with the amount of forces that was advancing towards the kingdom, the great barrier that surrounds the Kingdom’s capital was also strong enough to ward away all average attacks and was unexpectedly stubborn against powerful ones. No one would believe that the 2 biggest hurdles were completely cleared so easily.



[Sensei, first of all we’ll temporarily join up with Amanogawa and the rest of the group. Then we’ll talk about what to do]



[ye, yes]



Aiko who stiffened up from the tension, is now being held by Hajime’s right hand. [Uhya!] A strange voice was leaked out, she wrapped her arms around Hajime’s neck to the suddenness of the action.



Then in that moment….



Ka!!



A severe silver light poured in from the outside.



[~!?]



A light as strong as the moonlights rays came pouring into the room, instinctively alarm bells were raised in Aiko’s mind.



However, Hajime wasn’t shaken at all and proceeded to jump out of the room through the hole he previously made. Aiko screamed while clinging onto Hajime due to the rapid movements, there wasn’t any time to worry.



Hajime, it was simultaneous, grabbing Aiko and dashing out of the room before the light completely eradicated the room in the very next moment.



Boba~!!



There wasn’t a roaring sound when the room was crushed, it just simply evaporated, scattering into particles. The top of the temple was made of steel, now its become nothing more than particles much finer than sand, it was then blown away due to the night wind and disappeared into the sky.



To the specific phenomenon, Hajime while using “Aerodynamic” to stand in the air, opened his eyes wide and muttered.



[.....Was that…..decomposition?]



[Nicely answered, irregular]



To his short muttering came an unexpected answer, a voice resembling the ringing of a bell, however, it was cold and void of all emotions.



When Hajime turned his glance to where the voice sounded, there, a woman with silver hair and blue eyes glared at Hajime from the nearby rooftop. Hajime, then guessed that this was the woman that kidnapped Aiko.



In the first place, though unlike Ririana’s description she wasn’t wearing a nun’s habit, instead, this woman was clad in a completely white dress and armor. The dress was sleeveless and only went up to knee height, her arms, legs, and head were clad in protective armor, and a metallic plate hung on both sides of her waist. Its the figure of a warrior no matter how you look at it. Exactly like a Valkyrie.



The silver haired woman, leaped through the air as if gravity had no hold of her. And, in one rotation positioned herself infront of the moon, a pair of silver wings expanded behind her back.



~basaa~ the wings expanded, it appears that the silver wings were shrouded in a silver-light magic. With the moon behind her, she looked mysteriously divine as her silver hair drifted in the wind, she carried beauty and charm that was out of this world.



However, unfortunately if not for her eyes. Despite her immense beauty, only her eyes gave off a cold impression as if frozen in ice. Not the coldness of hating another being. it was exactly like a single-minded mechanical tool. It was the eyes of a doll.



The silver haired woman, while looking down on Hajime with Aiko being held closely, slowly extended both arms out horizontally.



Then, the gauntlets shined momentarily, in the next moment, a large white sword was gripped in both hands. The large swords were nearly 2 meters in length and it was also clad in a silver-light magic, the silver haired woman who seemed unaffected by its weight, calls out to Hajime without an ounce of feelings.



[I am Nointo. I am “God’s Apostle”, for my master, I will remove all unnecessary pieces]



A declaration of war. The woman that introduced herself as Nointo, in the truest sense, she is “God’s Apostle”. Finally, it seems they’ve decided to intervene with Hajime. To directly remove us from “god’s game”.



Silver magic gushes out around Nointo. A huge pressure attacked Hajime and Aiko, it was as if they were standing underneath a huge waterfall.



Though Aiko was trying to endure it desperately, her expression turns blue then white, her body starts trembling uncontrollably. [We’re finished] nearly losing her consciousness, a bright red magic surrounded Aiko. The bright red magic shined even more to protect Aiko, it completely blocked out the pressure that Nointo released.



Aiko opened her eyes widely, she turned her face to Hajime who she assumed was the cause. Then, there, without even shaking one bit, he received the pressure, she saw Hajime’s appearance who was bearing his teeth ferociously.



As he received it, Aiko’s skeptical gaze was no longer on his mind, Hajime, just like Nointo, declared war.



[Kill me if you can, puppet of God]



With those words as the signal, at an altitude of 8,000 meters in the sky over [Kamiyama], “God’s Apostle” and the “Monster” that rose out from hell clashed with one another.



~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~



Shortly before Nointo’s raid on Hajime, Yue, Shia, Kaori, and Ririana advanced through the royal palace using hidden passages. Their purpose was to take Ririana to Kouki’s group.



Originally, it was decided that Yue and them were to rescue Aiko at [Kamiyama] and also search for the great labyrinth for the Age of Gods magic, because Ririana situation of finding Kouki’s group to help with her current situation was a trivial task.



However, in order to ensure Aiko’s safety, they needed to make sure that Kouki’s group has not been brainwashed, It was necessary to confirm whether they were safe.



Besides, [Kamiyama] is literally the head temple for the church, even to rescue Aiko, its preferable that they don’t cause an uproar, in order to not be noticed, one person would be enough to search for Aiko’s place of confinement so Hajime went alone.



Therefore, Yue who remained at the Kingdom’s capital, to Kaori who insisted on helping Ririana, decided to tag along because it wasn’t that much trouble in the first place.



Still, just in case of emergencies, Teio was put on standby somewhere in the Kingdom. This was because they needed someone to overlook the overall situation of the Kingdom.



As such, Yue’s group traveled in the palace through hidden passages, and appeared into a guest room. Behind where they came through, the antique quietly returned to its natural spot, hiding the passageway as if nothing had happened.



[At this time, everyone is likely sleeping in their own rooms. …...For the time being, lets head for Shizuku’s bedroom]



Ririana lowered her voice in the darkness. Then turned to face the direction of Shizuku’s room. Rather than relying on Kouki the hero, her evaluation is realistically shown.



Nodding in agreement with Ririana, Shia leads the group because she has the highest perception in the party. Shizuku and the others are currently sleeping in the higher class rooms so they are currently in a separate building*<-or is it wing?*, the group is advancing through the corridors with silent steps as the moonlight seeps through.



And, after advancing a while, it happened.



Zudoooon!!



Pakyaaaan!!



The roaring sound resembled that of a bombardment, right afterwards, the sound of glass breaking could be heard throughout the Kingdom’s capital. The air shook and trembled from the impact, the windows in the corridor that Yue’s group was taking was also rattling.



[Wawa, what on earth!?]



[This is…..it can’t be!?]



Shia while using her rabbit ears to their maximum point in order to hear people who might appear, instinctively covers up both of her rabbit ears while leaking out a voice. Right afterwards, Ririana’s face turned pale and she rushed up to the window. Yue and them also approach the window to see what’s going on.



And, to the spectacle that greets their eyes…...



[Such a thing…..the great barrier…..it was broken?]



Ririana covers her mouth and says in a shaking voice. It’s just as she said, in the night sky of the Kingdom’s capital, the great barrier broke into particles of magic and scattered like dust.



Ririana can only watch the spectacle in amazement, a light flashed at that next moment, the roaring sound was heard once again. And, the thin film of light which covered the Kingdom’s capital began wavering.



[Even the second barrier….why…..is it so fragile? With this, soon…..]



What is the great barrier that Ririana speaks of, there are three huge magic barriers that defend the Kingdom from foreign enemies. An artifact generates the barrier into three points, magicians of the imperial court pour their magic powers into it regularly in order to sustain the barriers. It’s strength has been proven many times, the Kingdom has been defended from the Majinzoku’s invasion for hundreds of years. This was one of the reasons why the war is still at a state of standstill.



A barrier of absolute protection was broken down in a single moment. And, just now, the second barrier was also close to breaking. The closer the barriers are to the Kingdom, the stronger they become, but if the second barrier was about to break at any moment now, it’s only a matter of time before the last one falls as well. The royal palace is getting noisy, it appears they’ve noticed that the barrier was broken. Lights begin to flicker on at many places.



[It can’t be, an inside job? …...But, giving a hand….to the enemy forces? Just what is going on….]



It was Yue and them who answered Ririana who was too absorbed in the idea while being stunned.



“Do you hear me? Mistress, should I brief you of the situation?”



Their telepathy stones started shining, a voice resounded from it. It’s the voice of Teio who was left at the Kingdom’s capital. From the way of talking, they’ve seemed to roughly grasp what’s going on.



“N…..please do, Teio”



“Understood. About one kilometer south from the Kingdom’s capital, there are Majinzoku leading a large army of demons. The white dragon from that time is there too. Its breath was what had destroyed the barrier. However, I don’t see the leaders figure”



[It can’t be, an invasion? How, how on earth did they manage to get so close…...]



To Teio’s report, Ririana frowns with a doubtful expression.



Towards that doubtfulness, Yue and them could also imagine it. The rider of the white dragon, Freed Bagua, the Majinzoku from the time where space magic was obtained at [Mountain of Great Flames]. Even for Yue, it's virtually impossible to open a “gate” for a whole army to pass through, but if there was some assistance it might be possible.



To actually warp across the entire continent*<-they actually said something about North and South but because i couldn’t understand it i improvised and left it vague* without attracting attention, in order to appear right underneath our noses at the Kingdom’s capital. There is no other way but that. Though the white dragon is attacking, he probably can’t move around much if that were the case, he’s probably resting in the back giving orders.



In the mean time, the sound of glass being broken resounds through the air again. The second barrier was broken. While frustrated, Ririana urges to meet up with Kouki and them. However, Yue shook her head.



[.......We separate here. You guys go on]



[Na, here? what do you…..]



Ririana frowned dubiously and started to say that quickly meeting up with Kouki and the rest and planning their next actions would be best. While Yue was opening the window, her eyes narrowed and spoke of her reason coldly.



[......The Majinzoku rider of the white dragon hurt Hajime. …..I’m going to beat him until he cries]



Apparently, due to the surprise attack at [Mountain of Great Flames] Yue carried a deep grudge against Freed. All members at the place could do nothing towards Yue’s dangerous atmosphere.



[A, are you angry, Yue-san…..]



[.....Shia? Have you already forgotten?]



[No way. I’ll continue to beat him even if he starts crying and apologizing]



Though Shia instinctively tsukomied at the angry Yue, towards Yue’s words that were expressionless, Shia started saying something even more extreme. From Shia who usually had a bright smile*<-Improvised, something about her smile*, with an expressionless face she powerfully declared her stance. Shia also seemed to not be able to forgive what had happened before.



[And that’s why, Kaori-san, Riri-san. Yue and I, in order to discipline the owner of that giant lizard, we’ll be leaving here]



[.....N, anyone else who obstructs us as well]



As soon as they said that, both Yue and Shia went out the window without hearing what Kaori and Ririana’s had to say. Freed’s life is on the line. Escape, Freed! Quickly, run away! is what his companions would have said if they were there.



The night breeze and noise entered through the open window. For a while, Kaori and Ririana stood silently still in place, then they began to advance once again like nothing had happened.



[.....Nagumo-san….is very loved….]



[Yes…insanely.….if not.... they’re quite the powerful enemies]



[Kaori….in order to survive, work hard ok? I’ll support you]



[Yes. Thank you, Riri….]



Afterwards Riri turned around mutters in a sad voice, [The way I’m treated is becoming more and more crude….], the yell was admirably sent to Kaori. [Actually, would Riri cry if I said that I also wanted to go?] while thinking in the corner of her head, Kaori and Riri quickly hurried towards Kouki and the rest of the group.





Chapter 100




The kingdoms capital had fallen into chaos after the sudden attack which broke the barrier and appearance of the Demon race.



As people start running out of their houses, they wore stunned faces as they were greeted to the great barrier shattering. To such a site, the patrol groups could only angrily shout, “Don’t leave your houses!”. The ones with quick thinking quickly pulled themselves together. They attempted to leave the capital with only the bare minimum luggage. Meanwhile, a significant amount of people gathered at the royal palace gates to seek shelter! Screams were heard.



Although it was late at night, with this amount of noise, it wouldn’t be weird for a mob to be formed in the next few minutes. Especially because the royal palace wasn’t able to calm down the confusion either. Anyways, the royal palace was confused the most about the situation, especially when everything happened in the flash of a few seconds. By the time they noticed, they were already placed into a situation where a sword was drawn before their throats. It was to be expected.



Although they were trying to quickly assemble their army…..



Pakyaaaan!!



It was not on time.



The last barrier was finally broken, the force of monsters that were created through Age of God magic and Demon soldiers riding them surged forward, making the land rumble in the process. Their last defensive line was only a wall made of stone which enclosed the kingdom’s capital. Although that’s the only thing, it was still boasted of having considerable strength…….however thinking that it would last very long would be too optimistic.



In order to crush the wall, the Demons assembled multiple people to cast advanced magic. Along with that the monsters casted peculiar flame and lightning magic. Ice shards and rock shards shot out, and a group of cyclops-beetles which were four meter in length started scraping the walls with their maces.



Even at a different location, there were boar typed monsters which measured up to five meters in length, bashing against the wall with an intense force while clad in wind to increase their power. With that, a destruction on the level of an earthquake struck the wall with every impact. Furthermore, the monsters with flight such as black eagles and grey dragons were in the skies and completely ignored the wall and continued in to invade the capital.



Though the soldiers that were stationed on top of the wall were fighting back desperately towards the unexpected large army, their interception was badly carried out. It was as if trying to counterattack a steel train’s rush with an airsoft gun.



In such a situation, standing by Tio who was watching the overall situation from the big clock tower in the capital, were Yue and Shia who had just left the royal castle.



“…….Tio, have you found that guy?”



“Tio-san, where’s the idiotic guy at?”



“….You guys….no, maa, although I understand your feelings? ‘With everyone gathered together it’s much more reassuring!’ is what I remember Princess Liliana saying, she’s quite pitiful…..to be discarded so easily.”



“……Don’t mind.”



“It’s a minor thing.”



Tio was staring at Yue and Shia with an amazed expression, the two didn’t seem to think much about it at all. This must also be Hajime’s influence. They’re not interested if they have no opponent.



Yue and Shia both have their eyes opened wide while looking for Freed Baghaur, and then their telepathy stones reacted. Hajime’s voice came from it.



“Oi! Tio! Come over here immediately!”



“Nuo! Master? What’s wrong?”



Due to the unexpectedly strong voice which came from the telepathy stone, Tio who was called instinctively expressed her surprise.



“A dangerous one came out. I want you to take care of Sensei. Otherwise, I won’t be able to go all out.”



“!? Alright, I understand! I’ll head over there immediately!”



Tio who recognized that Hajime was fighting an opponent where he needed to be at full power, in an instant used “Dragon Transformation”, then quickly dashed towards the target which was 8,000 meters in the sky.



“…..Hajime, be careful”



“Hajime-san! Yue-san and I will be going to finish off the monster tamers, so don’t worry!”



“Ha? Aren’t you guys with the Princess….Uuo, that was close! Sorry, it doesn’t seem like I’ll be able to talk in this situation! Though I don’t know what you guys plan on doing, be careful as well”



Though Hajime seemed doubtful about what Shia said, due to the intense battle he was in, he had to cut the connection. While protecting Aiko, the opponent wasn’t letting up against Hajime at all. In an instant, Yue and Shia started wondering if they should go and help.



“Yue-san, what will you do?”



“……If its Hajime then it’ll be alright. Tio will be there too. More so, we need to take care of the demon tamer. Also, we can’t allow them to break the Age of God magic formation.”



Right, the reason why Yue came out to the battlefield, though there was also the reason for getting revenge for Hajime, she also couldn’t just let the other Age of Gods magic bearer, Freed, run around unchecked.



In the case that Freed knew where the great labyrinth at Kamiyama was at, Just like before at the Great Volcano, he’ll likely head there first. Moreover, he might destroy the magic formation afterwards. They noticed that the monsters and structure of the Great Volcano will gradually be restored, so it’s possible that over time, everything will be restored, but it’s unknown how much time it would actually take. Therefore, Yue wanted to avoid that at any costs, and decided to attack Freed.



In the first place, retaliation was 90% of the reason…..



Then, at that time, while on top of the clock tower Yue and Shia noticed two monsters looking like a black eagle at approximately 3 to 4 meters in length. While eyeing Yue and Shia, they then dove down to attack from both the left and right.



Kueeeeee!!



The black eagles let out a courageous shout and approached. Without looking, Shia took out Doryukken from the “Treasure Warehouse” and set it to shooting mode, and then without hesitation shot out an exploding slug bullet. Yue as well, without looking, just snapped her fingers with her right hand and innumerable wind blades shot out like heavy rain.



Of the two black eagles which were approaching the girls, one’s head blew up due to a shock wave, and the other, like being executed by a Guillotine was chopped up into pieces. Their tragic appearances fell onto the roof of a civilian’s house. At that time, the people who were inside the house heard the noise and became extremely nervous from the sound.



After those two were killed, all monsters with flight turned around and noticed Yue and Shia. If you looked closely, you’d notice that about a third of them had Demons riding on them. After looking like they were surveying the situation when noticing the two eagles dropping down, understanding that the other party was a rabbitman and petite girl, as if looking at an idiot, they snorted at Yue and Shia, and then began chanting their magic.



Both Yue and Shia didn’t have any intentions to guard the kingdom from the big army, however their purpose was Freed Baghaur. It was like trying to leave without permission, there was no other way but to counterattack when being targeted.



For now, Shia said, “We aren’t enemies, just now we were attacked so there was no other choice.”, although they were laughing at the foolishness it didn’t seem like they had any intentions of stopping their attacks.



The Demons thought the opponent was worthless so they proceeded and left a few friends behind to deal with it, in the next moment, the screams and roaring sound of their last moments resounded out from behind, and when they turned around to see the cause, their eyes became wide in astonishment.



Googaaaaaaa!!



It was a dragon made of thunder, roaring as it devoured their friends and monsters one after another.



To the spectacle, the Demons could only stare in blank surprise. Trying to escape from the thunder dragon, a Demon desperately tried to get away towards his friends on his monster, stretching out his hand, as if asking for help.…..however, in the next instant an exploding slug bullet flew through the wind with murderous intent from behind, and the gray dragon and its rider broke into pieces.



Although the blood relatives of those who died became ferocious, they struggled to understand what they just witnessed. The Demons that became stiff pulled themselves together and prepared to pursue the cause. And they began looking for the girls who crushed their companion in an instant. Due to the unexpectedness, they began seeing illusions of their own deaths. With the high tension, they forgot to even wipe their own sweat as they strained their eyes. And, in front of them appeared Yue and Shia.



However, to them their appearance was completely unexpected. Because rather than hiding from the group pursuing them, they stayed in the same place. Yue and Shia didn’t even bother looking at them. Just like the first time, they concentrated their sights on searching for something outside of the wall. Their backs spoke louder than words.



In other words, they couldn’t care less.



The moment they guessed that, the Demons’ expressions which were stiff with high tension distorted into anger and rage. While breaking their comrades into pieces, in Yue and Shia’s eyes, they were nothing more than pebbles being kicked on the roadside. As a warrior, or due to their pride as Demons being trampled, heat ran through their entire bodies and their blood boiled.



“Damn you—!!”



“Uooooooo!!”



“Die–!!”



While consumed by anger, their abilities as soldiers were natural and they got into their positions. They showed great teamwork. They formed a box on all sides to surround them and then they all shot magic at the same time. The magic from the Demons were excellent. Normally, the scene would cause someone’s expression to twist in despair.



However, they were amazed by Yue’s bored expression. Then, she flexed her finger like a thin baton.



“……The difference in ability, you should learn to realize it instinctively.”



At the same time that she said those words, all the magic was completely blocked out by the thunder dragon coiling around Yue and Shia like a cocoon. And, the thunder dragon once again opened its jaws like a gate, as if they were committing suicide, they all looked as if they were voluntarily jumping in.



Then, expecting that multiple people on the other side would begin chanting magic which excelled in penetration, another part of the thunder dragon opened. Shia whose rabbit ears were fluttering dove out with the speed of a cannonball.



In an instant, all the nearby Demons knew that she planned to obstruct their chants, so they all casted the beginner class magic flame bullet which practically took no time to cast at all.



However, Shia, as if she didn’t even care, dodged all the bullets with simple outbursts from using Doryukken to change her orbit, she then swung Doryukken sideways aiming at the three Demons who were chanting.



“Ri… ya… aaaaa!”



With one shout, Doryukken was swung, and due to gravity magic, it obtained the weight of 4 tons on the moment of impact. With that, her body was also strengthened through physical reinforcement. The result was better off unsaid. The three Demons’ upper bodies were blasted away. Even the monsters that were being ridden had their spines crushed due to the shockwave. They were blown away while raising the screams of their last moments.



Shia who was still in the air, in that instant cut down Doryukken and her own weight to 5 kilos or less, and again, danced through the air like a feather. Then, switching Doryukken back into shooting mode, exploding slug bullets were let loose aiming at the Demons that shot the flame bullets. As intended, once again in the night sky of the Kingdom, bright red flowers bloomed.



Shia, she pulls out 2 colorful disks which shot out into the air from the “Treasure Warehouse”, they floated in the air disregarding gravity and was being used as a stand. She looked over the surroundings while in place, tapping Doryukken on her shoulder.



Just then, in a place a little away, the last Demons left was about to desperately commence a suicide attack on Yue.



“Little girl… gaaa!! I’m gonna kill you!!”



With bloodshot eyes, and an “even if I’m stabbed!” kind of feeling could be felt from his desperation. However, Yue’s attitude towards him was cool like a wet blanket.



“… You’re 300 years too early, boy…”



He probably planned on attacking when the thunder dragon was still dealing with his friend. However, his lips distorts when he thinks that what Yue’s words meant was that the thunder dragon had already returned, immediately after that, his head was cleanly cut off by a wind blade that came from below and it flew into the alleyway with spinning eyes.



After time was meaninglessly taken, Yue began to search for Freed once again. Next to her, Shia landed while carrying Doryukken.



“They completely think that we’re part of the Kingdom’s fighting forces right?”



“… It doesn’t matter. They can think that if they want.”



“How dry… Maa, it certainly seems that way…..”



The two joked around with each other as Freed was not easily found, Maybe, he’s already gone to the great labyrinth through space magic…….they began to become uneasy, then,



“!? Yue-san!”



“Nn.”



At the same time as Shia’s warning, Yue jumped away from the clock tower without hesitation. Immediately after that, an oval film appeared in the middle of air, a large aurora gushed out from it. The aurora completely erased the upper part of the clock tower where Yue and them were standing, however it was so powerful that the building was blown off radically.



“As expected, some kind of foresight. How annoying……”



At the same time that the masculine voice resounded, the Demons, Freed Baghaur who had red hair and was the white dragon’s rider, appeared from the oval film. From his expression, you could see irritation from the ease of dodging the surprise attack.



Then a white dragon’s appearance came through the “gate”, along with several Demons riding on the back of black eagles and grey dragons appearing by the hundreds, Yue and Shia were completely surrounded.



At the same time……a terrible roaring sound is heard and a part of the outer wall was finally destroyed, afterwards demons and Demons invade the capital one after another, some of the troops saw Yue and Shia and rushed up fiercely at them. It appears that they intend on completely killing Yue and Shia here once and for all.



“I can’t believe that you’ve managed to survive from that situation. …..As I expected, that man’s passion to survive……is too dangerous. To start with, we’ll completely kill you who is that guy’s companions.”



Towards the words of Freed which contained hatred, however, Yue and Shia were both fearless. And, they both replied back at the same time. It strangely, was the same words that the boy whom they loved currently in the sky 8,000 meters above the ground had said.



“Kill us if you can (please).” X2



As if those words were a signal, the surrounding demons and Demons shot magic all at once.



Flame spears of the caliber which was enough to even scorch the atmosphere were flying around, lasers of water were shot out cutting through space, wind of murderous intent became blades and attacked, a bombardment of ice and snow roared out, sands of petrification and permanent poison scatters about, and a whip of thunder shaped like a snake moved around in the night sky. And, an Aurora tore through the sky just in case.



A group of 40 Demons or more and over 100 demons. In every direction, lies an enemy. The sight is filled with a storm of attacks.



However, Yue and Shia, were still calm despite being surrounded by death on all sides, their postures showed no sign of attempting to dodge. Some Demons, “Have they given up…….”, as their expressions showed that they were losing momentum, only Freed raised his awareness because of an unpleasant presentiment which rose intensely from within.



“Field Pierce.”



Yue activated her Age of Gods magic.



Immediately after that, two shining gates appeared before the Aurora. Freed dubiously drops his eyebrow. When connecting the gate to such coordinates, even if they teleport the aurora, it’ll likely appear out of the other gate for a direct hit.



However, that expectation, could only be assumed if only one pair of gates were created. Freed based his expectation on his own limitations.



Therefore, he couldn’t understand why Yue and Shia jumped through the gate, it wasn’t possible for him to notice immediately that a gate had already appeared behind them.



“Cra-, evade it!”



Yue and Shia disappeared through the other gate, the moment when the aurora connected with the gate, though Freed who noticed his misunderstanding warned his companions, but it was already too late.



Although Freed himself was able to evade on time, many subordinates behind him… while being directly hit by the aurora became slightly conscious that they were dying, and with that only a few were left.



“Curse you, killing my subordinates. ……I didn’t expect you to be able to open 2 at the same time….does that mean I’ve still underestimated you…….”



Rage filled his eyes, at the same time, he was also in awe that Yue was able to create both gates simultaneously and properly succeeded to use it in combat. There was also no traces of chanting or using magic formations either, though he confirmed their true nature in his mind, right now, it’s necessary to look for the 2 missing people.



“Freed! Over there!”



One of Freed’s subordinates pointed outside the outer wall. Certainly Yue and Shia were there.



It was difficult to fight as houses were right underneath them. If Freed truly hopes for a confrontation between them, it would be unlikely that he would just continue invading the Kingdom’s capital, and so he would transfer himself directly outside of the outer walls. Of course, it would be an emergency situation if he actually continued his invasion instead of confronting Yue and Shia, as the sickle of the death god would surely swing down on his back.



Because Freed also understood this, he couldn’t turn his back against them. Yue stretched her right hand out and with her finger Kui Kui bent it as gesture to approach, from this action, all Demons’ rage exceeded their boiling point.



It was obvious that the young girl with a childish appearance was provoking them, and the detestable rabbitman who slaughtered their comrades was also there, with that in their minds, “We’ll be your opponents.”, while lining up their sights….the provocation wasn’t possible to ignore due to their own pride as the superior race even if the opponents were few in numbers.



“You’re only a little girl!”



“You dirty beast, don’t get so full of it!”



While shouting such abusive words, all the Demons attacked at the same time. They sent the demons after Yue who was able to fire off fatal magic in rapid succession without time lags at all. From the ground, part of the large army also attacks Yue and Shia fiercely.



Shia, thanks to the “Treasure Warehouse”, was able to continuously fire out explosive slug bullets which were practically unlimited in number. In the sky, and even on the ground, Shia’s magical power emits a color resembling moonstones, rippling out, in the next instant, it was converted into a shockwave and destruction scattered everywhere. The only thing that remained were only their broken corpses, crushed as if they were ran over to death.



And, there, the white dragon and grey dragons all vomited out their breaths at once. The attack would be fatal to Shia even with physical strengthening applied when hit directly. However, Shia wasn’t panicking at all.



““Exceeding Curse.”



Yue shot out a black swirling globe which appeared before Shia’s eyes. The jet black sphere contained supergravity, just like a black hole, the aurora’s approaching Shia were twisted then completely devoured.



“Ku, you used it last time too. …..that Age of God magic that I don’t know of. All members, listen! I’ll take care of the blond caster! You all gang up and kill that rabbitman! Separate them apart, don’t allow them to cooperate!”



“Understood!” X5



It appears that, Shia serves as Yue’s vanguard and while away looked like she was breathing exhaustively, the rear guards decided to separate Yue in order to defeat them both. Though that’s what it seems, when Shia started to evacuate towards Yue, the Demons riding an especially huge black eagle which was clad in a huge tornado, charged out like a cannonball.



Shia who was in the air, wielded Doryukken and looked as if she was going to throw it, due to the unexpected timing, the Demons prepared themselves in a suicide attack, the other side wasn’t supposed to be able to respond on time. With one rotation while in place using the outbursts from Doryukken, all attacks coming from the Demons were stopped and they were all blown away radially.



In a rush, the Demons on the black eagle cladded in a tornado tried to confront her, as expected there was no time for her to counter the attack, even evading wouldn’t be on time either, so she took up Doryukken as a shield and increased her physical power as well. One of Doryukken’s gimmicks activated, while making a sound Kashun Kashun a round shield formed.



“Even if it’s just you! I’ll definitely kill you without fail!”



The Demons with short blond hair shouted out, while looking at Shia with eyes filled with hatred from his companions being killed, and collided with Doryukken which was held up.



Shia who was pushed back was separated from Yue, although she tried to increase her weight to withstand the push, before it was actually carried out, a black teleport gate had already opened up behind her. In that instant Yue and Shia’s glances overlapped, the rash suicide attack was meant to buy time for Freed to cast his space magic.



“Yue-san! I’m sorry! We’ve been separated!”



“N…..there’s no problems. I’ll kill this fellow here.”



Immediately before being pushed into the gate, Yue with a thumb sticking up said, “Good luck!” (Tn: In an American accent). Shia smiled a little from that. The smile was seen by the Demon riding the huge black eagle, his face twisted into rage. Although he didn’t really mind Shia, it was Yue’s own comrade that was swallowed into the gate which meant that they were now both separated.



“That frivolously smiling face, how disgusting. When your Limbs are torn apart we’ll drag them in front of your man.”



The first Demons that passed through said while exiting the gate. Seeming unlike the rest of the Demons, Shia guessed that it was due to a personal grudge, while frowning dubiously she asked him.



“…….Have we met somewhere? I don’t remember having done anything to receive such stares though?”



“Do you still remember that Demon woman with red hair?”



Shia who couldn’t understand why the sudden talk of a woman turned up could only incline her head in wonder. But, the male Demons, took that act as not being able to remember, while clenching his teeth together, he voiced out further information about his grudge.



“You bastard, the woman that you guys killed at “Orcus Great Labyrinth.”.”



“…………Ah! That person!”



“You bastard.”



It was very clear that Shia had forgotten all about it until now, the man who was already mad till the boiling point shot out numerous blades of wind with short chants. There, Shia avoided them as if they were nothing.



“Wait a sec, who was that person to you? With just what was said a while ago I still don’t understand.”



“Cattleya, the woman that you guys murdered…..was my fiancée!”



“! Ah, I see…..what about it.”



Shia nodded as she consented.



It seems that the man in front of her, was the lover that the woman at “Orcus Great Labyrinth.” whispered her love to for before dying——-it was Mikhail. Though she doesn’t understand how he found out, he knew that Hajime was the one that had killed his fiancée, he looks as if he’s burning with revenge. To make Hajime feel the same feelings that he did, he plans to bring both Shia and Yue’s corpses forth in front of him.



“How dare you, Cattleya……was wise and gentle, she always thought of her country……”



Mikhail who was shouting out his grudge with bloodshot eyes, Shia’s usual brightness became cold as if it were a lie, and replied with extremely light words.



“I don’t know anything about that.”



“Wh, what was that!”



“No, if she didn’t want to die she could have just not fight? In the first place she was the one that challenged us. Hajime-san even warned her. We won’t chase if you run away. If a important person was killed, it’s obvious that they’d bear a grudge….even if you told what the person who was killed was like……we’re not interested……do you guys hear me? Just like all the lives of the ones that you’ve taken up till now…..there’s no way you’d be interested.”



“Sh, shut up, shut up, shut up! Cattleya’s enmity! I’m going to torment you until you go mad, then kill you!”



Mikhail, yelling as if he lost his temper, another tornado was produced again to increase the huge black eagle’s speed while plunging towards Shia. It appears that the tornado was Mikhail’s magic and not the huge black eagle’s inherent ability. While riding, Mikhail continued chanting and numerous wind blades shot out from the tornado in an attempt to block Shia’s escape routes.



Shia, wielding Doryukken, knocked down the wind blades and then lightened her weight as she jumped to a disk as a stand in order to avoid the charge of the tornado cladded eagle.



However, before she avoided it, troops of Demons riding black eagles gathered as Shia and Mikhail were talking. Because Mikhail was riding the huge black eagle, they were likely his subordinates.



Shia was in a situation where all the black eagle forces that were in the skies shot out needles of stone at her. It was exactly like a downpour of rain. Shia shot out exploding slug bullets to create shockwaves in order to knock down the needles.



And, jumped to a nearby black eagle after opening a way through the barrage. Disregarding the startled Demons, she swung Doryukken without any hesitation. The Demons that was hit vanished into the darkness of the night as all his internal organs and bones were crushed.



Shia further continued to use her momentum of the attack and crushed the Demons and the black eagle that were away from the rest.



“Ku, do not engage in close combat! The sky is our domain! Attack with waves of magic and stone needles from a distance!”



Towards the comrades that were blown away like a pinball, Mikhail judged that close combat would be impossible and ordered for all attacks to be strictly ranged. Again, Shia was forced to avoid their magic and stone needles that came from all directions by continually jumping off the disks that she sent out as stepping stones.



However, she never got within range to attack, every time she moved up they distanced themselves and she was becoming irritated at that fact. And then, she judged that it wouldn’t be efficient if she only used exploding slug bullets, she pulled out a new item from the “Treasure Warehouse”.



It was a red metallic ball. It was approximately 2 meters in diameter. A chain extends from the metallic ball and Shia attached it to the top of Doryukken. Then, she used her leg to kick up the metallic ball that was dropping due to gravity and swung horizontally at the metallic ball with Doryukken.



Gagin!!



With a roaring sound the metallic ball flew out at an unbelievable speed.



While panicking the targeted Demons tried to quickly evade it, however suddenly, the side of the metallic ball bursted out and with that its course changed. The Demons and his black eagle were not able to respond to the suddenness, the metallic ball which weighed up to 10 tons collided into them, they were instantly killed as every bone in their bodies were crushed in the night sky.



Shia pulled back the chain with Doryukken and the metallic ball which just slaughtered its enemy quickly returns to her reach. And as it was returning she was firing out exploding slug bullets in rapid successions in order to keep the others in check, or, simply to kill them. When the metallic ball returned, it was then once again launched at another target.



Right, what is Doryukken’s newest gimmick, it’s basically kendama (Tn: Japanese toy) with a built-in system that allows it to change its weight and shoot out shells in order to change its trajectory.



“Uriyaaaaaaaa!”



Shia continued to play kendama in the night sky of the Kingdom’s capital while letting out shouts. When the ball was sent off, its trajectory was always changing and it always returned after blowing away its target. The kendama became a red meteor that shot out irregularly throughout the night sky, it began to turn even redder as the blood of enemies were smeared on it.



“Curse you, such strange techniques! Above! Attack her from outside of her range!”



Mikhail, while biting his lips from his subordinates being killed one after another, gave out orders for a barrage of attacks to be sent out in order to keep her in check and buy time for him to cast his own magic. Shia easily avoids the attacks as if dancing in the air weightlessly.



Then, immediately after avoiding the last attack, ranged attack magic poured down over her head like a wall.



Shia held the center of Doryukken over her head and began to turn it in circles. With that, the metallic ball that was connected by its chain also began to rotate due to the centrifugal force and was swung along with Doryukken. Doryukken and the Kendama rotated at high-speeds with intense force, it became an improvised round shield which was also bordered with a red color, and the magic attacks that were pouring down were all blown away and dispersed because of the matchless force.



“You’re mine!”



Mikhail who judged that she would be too busy dealing with the overhead attacks, charged at Shia. The huge black eagle shot out an extraordinary amount of stone needles which ran along with the wind magic ordinance. The local storm raised a howl as it rushed towards Shia.



Shia allowed herself to free-fall in order to reduce her altitude quickly and avoided the bombardment of wind. Mikhail’s lips twisted as expected, again he decided to aim for the moment when she lands due to evading, and he planned to shoot out more blades of wind.



However, in the eyes of Mikhail who was watching his target, Shia did not have an expression wrapped in despair, the spectacle that he saw was that a fist sized iron ball appeared from thin air underneath Shia’s feet and she bounced off it.



Shia took out the iron ball from the “Treasure Warehouse” and used her legs at maximum strength to launch herself off of it. The iron ball that was kicked out at an overpowering velocity, with perfect aim, hit the huge black eagle which Mikhail was ridding! The vivid sound of flesh caving in could be heard.



Kuueeeeeeee!!!



The huge black eagle screamed from the pain of the impact as it falls while spinning. Mikhail again, shot out a cannonball of wind that contained stone needles in desperation as he fell with the huge black eagle.



Shia who finally passed by all magic attacks that came down at her head, bounced away the quickly approaching cannonball of wind using Doryukken. However, the needles made of stone couldn’t be completely avoided, some of the needles pierced into her shoulder and arm.



“We did it! She was struck by Kotorisu’s stone needles!”



“With this it’s over!”



The needles themselves didn’t deal much damage, however all the Demons looked equally joyful that Shia was hit by the stone needles.



Shia looked at their suspicious expressions.



The answer to her question was answered immediately. Starting from where the needles were sticking out, she began to petrify. It appears that Kotorisu was the name of the huge black eagle, its inherent magic seemed to allow its stone needles to petrify upon contact. It was an unpleasant and troublesome ability.



Normally, when afflicted with an abnormal status you’d use specific medicine to cure it, or purify it with recovery light magic. However, right now Shia is alone on the battlefield so the Demons thought it was already over. As long as they continue attacking her without giving her a chance to take medicine she’ll be completely petrified.



However, in the very next moment, their expressions which were convinced of victory, changed into one that was dumbfounded, and finally changed into despair.



Because…..



“Mmm, what a blunder. However, if it’s just this much!”



While saying so, Shia pulled out and threw away the needles and in order to concentrate she closed her eyes. Then in one moment, the petrification that was gradually spreading, stopped suddenly, following that, the flesh that had turned to stone regained its former color. And, finally, the wound from the needles were also patched up, she returned to her normal state as if nothing happened.



“W, Why!”



“What’s going on!”



There wasn’t any signs of recovery magic being used, there also wasn’t any behaviors of using medicine either, however Shia easily cured the petrification and damage from the needles by just concentrating a little, fear began to appear on the Demons’ expressions. A fear of the unknown which couldn’t be understood. Their voices were upset and trembling.



There’s no need to think much about how Shia managed to heal herself. She simply used reproduction magic. As usual, her aptitude with it was rather bad, it was only enough to be able to heal wounds and abnormal statuses within her body.



Her selfheal was like the downgraded version of Yue’s “Automatic Reproduction”, she can even cure serious illnesses, however it’s not automatic and she cannot reproduce something external. However, a few wounds or simple fractures would heal within several seconds with a little bit of concentration and if she spends more time she can also recover from serious illnesses.



There’s no helping it that the Demons were despairing. Because including her overwhelming power she also possesses the ability to recover, they couldn’t think of any methods to corner her. The eyes that were looking at Shia were the same eyes that the people who confronted Hajime had. In other words, a monster! Then.



“Saa, here I come?”



Shia while holding Doryukken quickly appears before the eyes of the stiff and confused Demons. Then, a deadly blow! With just one hit, another Demons died. At that moment, the remaining Demons went into panic and yelled out an incomprehensible cry, there was absolutely no cooperation and they began to suicide attack recklessly.



Shia calmly, while brandishing the Kendama, or through the use of exploding slug bullets, quickly and surely reduces their numbers.



Finally the last man of Mikhail’s forces became food for Doryukken, however the moonlight was suddenly shut out and a shadow covered the entire area.



Shia looked up above, behind the dark clouds, Mikhail was falling from the sky. It looks like the huge black eagle was also at its limits, a straight dive attack might have been all it was capable of now.



“Innumerable thunder pouring down from the sky, avoid it if you can!”



At the same time that Mikhail shouted, innumerable amounts of thunder poured down while roaring out disorderly. It was like an intense rain of thunder. This magic originally caused a very large thunder strike to fall from the dark clouds, an advanced attack magic “Thunder Mallet” of the wind system, he daringly multiplied it, he likely created it as an Area of Effect magic. With that alone, you could tell how advanced Mikhail was with magic.



The thunder quickly overtakes Mikhail and pours straight down towards Shia.



Most likely, in order to absolutely kill her, he took up the resolution to stab her despite his own thunder raining down as a suicide attack. He’s already used up a lot of power just multiplying the thunder, however superhuman Shia may be, she’s not fast enough to avoid the thunderbolts.



The speed of which thunder falls is 150 kilometers per second. It’s not possible to avoid it after recognizing it. In Mikhail’s eyes, as his subordinates were killed one after another he was enduring it while single-mindedly continuing his chant using all the magic power in his body, this time for sure, she’ll fall! His will of strength could be seen.



However, immediately afterwards, Mikhail saw an unbelievable scene. Unexpectedly, Shia had avoided the thunderbolts raining down. No, more accurately, it was as if she knew exactly where the area that wouldn’t be hit was and moved there before the thunderbolts fell.



It was Mikhail’s miscalculation. Shia had a technique that allowed her to avoid things even before it became recognizable.



A deviation of her inherent magic “Future Sight” and “Revelation Sight”. It allowed her to see up to 2 seconds into the future. Although it’s a downgraded version of her “Future Assumption” sight, rather it doesn’t even use magic power, it’s a convenient ability that can be used in rapid successions several times. It was the result of Shia’s efforts from continuously training.



“What are you, what exactly are you!”



“…..I’m just a rabbit eared woman.”



He couldn’t believe what he saw, Shia had avoided every thunderbolt, naturally, Mikhail’s attack while diving down can easily be fended off, and she wielded the Kendama and waited for him to pass by.



Then, the Kendama circled greatly around Mikhail, the chains coiled around him and he was instantly restrained.



“Nuguoo! Let go!”



“I’ll release you, just as you wished!”



Mikhail who was caught by the chain was flung by Doryukken, as he was freed the centrifugal force caused him to fly towards the ground. The centrifugal force caused by the heavyweight lump of iron was terrific, Mikhail was flung towards the ground like a meteorite.



At once, he set up a barrier of wind and escaped instant death, however it’s likely that every bone in his body was crushed as he laid on his back without moving an inch. Gobog Gobo he coughed out blood.



Shia landed by his side.



Carrying Doryukken on her shoulder, she had compromised Mikhail. Mikhail while still faintly conscious, his vacant eyes turned to Shia. On his lips, due to being unable to bring down his enemy, or, due to the impossible situation of being completely annihilated despite having close to 100 subordinates, a smile of self-ridicule that even Mikhail himself didn’t understand was shown. To be beaten down into this state, it’s possible he could do nothing but laugh at himself.



To Shia who was looking down on him, Mikhail realizes his end. In his heart, he apologized to his dear fiancée that he couldn’t take revenge, then he spoke his last words.



“….Goho, this….goho…..monster!”



“Fufu, Thank you very much!”



Mikhail’s last retaliation seemed to only have made Shia more pleased.



At last, while watching absentmindedly as the hammer was swung down at his head, Mikhail thought that if there was an afterlife, he would go and search for Cattleya, he lost consciousness as he was thinking such dark things.



While carrying Doryukken after giving the final blow, Shia’s cheeks are loosened because of Mikhail’s final words.



“It seems that finally I’ve become strong enough to be called a monster….fufu, it seems I’ve become closer to Hajime and them. Now then, how about Yue-san’s side……”



Shia looked towards Yue’s direction, they’ve been considerably distanced. And, even now she expected that she might still be able to give Freed one good hit, she began to dash out to join up with Yue.





Chapter 101




The shining moon became invisible behind the crowd of ash dragons.



There’s likely over 100 figures that could be seen. And at the center of it all is the white dragon, the appearance of Freed Bagua could be seen riding it’s back.



[Don’t think less of us. Dividing up the enemy forces is a standard technique in battles]



Shia and Mikhail had just disappeared into the transfer gate “Field Pierce” made through space magic. Then Freed ordered the black eagle force to pursue them, as they passed by they glared and trash talked Yue who was stationary.



Although there wasn’t any signs of wind magic being used at all, to the appearance that floats in the skies just like the moon that floats in the nocturnal sky, a smile appeared even when their reactions were heard, Yue is only quietly staring at Freed expressionlessly.



Freed is a proud Majinzoku, rather than looking at others equally, they’re looked down upon. He is a pious believer in their Majinzoku God whom they worship, he’s the type of man that would not accept any other way of life or values.



Hence, it was impossible that he would have an interest in a woman from another race. However, that Freed is now, while the ash dragons and his subordinates were still blocking the true moon, to the girl with a pretty face that shines just like the moon, felt charmed with the thoughts “It would be regrettable if such a gem were killed”.



With those thoughts, although he understands it’s necessary to kill Hajime, and though he holds hatred because his brethren were killed, still, foolish words came out of his mouth.



[How regrettable. …..Woman, as a spellcaster, no matter how much I want the ability to cast magic without chants, though this may be reckless in this situation. How about it? Will you join me? We won’t treat you badly just because you’re a woman]



Towards Freed’s invitation, Yue’s reply was….



[…..Fu~, come back after being reborn. Ugly man]



It was indescribably severe, a reply of severe sarcasm mixed with ridicule was returned.



By the way, it wouldn’t be an exaggeration that Freed’s figure if evaluated by ten people, every one of them would agree that he was a good-looking man. Combined with his vast powers, he was extremely popular to the Majinzoku women. Therefore, he’s not an ugly man at all.



However, Yue saw Freed’s desolate expression at the [Mountain of Great Flames] when he talked about his god, in her memory it was awful and sickening. Such a man, invited her with a clarified face. The only thing seen was already just a sickening foolish man. To begin with, she doesn’t feel anything for any other man but Hajime, so it was nothing but foolish talk to begin with.



When Yue’s response was heard, Freed’s eyes twitched and cramped up.



[Have you chosen your path as a martyr? Or, because of your loyalty to this country? Discard your teachings, do not simply follow a country in blind faith, do you plan on sacrificing your life for those kinds of things? That is the highest reaches of stupidity. Once you know of our god, “Aruvu-sama’s” teachings. Then, you’ll be purified after just closing your eyes just once!?]



To Freed who began blabbering on about unrelated topics, Yue simply answered by rapidly firing out Wind Blades. It was merely because she couldn’t endure hearing him babble on any longer.



A spray of blood dances on the evening winds. Because Freed managed to dodge his body, the Wind Blades that Yue shot out only managed to cut his shoulder shallowly. Immediately, Freed was able to react to the Wind Blades, he was definitely one of the few great people who conquered a labyrinth. If not, he would have lost an arm immediately.



To Freed who was glaring at her with anger, Yue only returned it with a cool gaze. Then, she announced to the foolish looking demon leader.



[…….Your question is unnecessary. The moment you hurt Hajime, you were already sentenced to death in agony]



As if the words were a signal, extremely cold ice and snow blew around Yue.



It instantly turned into a huge tornado, it climbed up towards the heavens as it surrounded Yue. A white storm which connected the heavens to the ground, the surrounding temperature is quickly reduced to absolute zero, the ash dragons which were blocking the moon were completely frozen.



This was a compound magic of ice at a superlative degree in the system attack magic “Frozen Prison” along with the intermediate wind system attack magic “Storm Emperor” which created a wide range tornado at absolute zero temperatures.



Almost like a mammoth being frozen instantaneously due to the climate change that brought upon the glacial epoch, the ash dragons all died without damage to their exterior, they fell and crashed onto the ground, breaking their bodies into pieces. It appears that their insides were completely frozen as red crystals of blood bounced around on the earth.



[Did you not hear me. ……Guess there’s no helping it. Shoot her down!]



Freed who lost nearly 20 ash dragons instantly, ordered the attack while gritting his teeth. As a result, the ash dragons all deploy together from all directions, top and bottom, they shot out aurora’s disorderly from every direction.



As if they were meteor showers, over 100 aurora’s were shot out in the night sky. The dark night was torn up by the flash of lights, as if the spellcaster in the center was committing suicide, an absolute zero blizzard blew out and raged like a flower pinholder.



From the impact of the countless auroras, the tornado of ice and snow dispersed as if melting in the air. The scattered ice and snow created a spiral, what appeared from the center was the appearance of Yue who was wounded from the powerful blast….actually no, it was an unhurt Yue accompanied by the black swirling star which circled around her.



Without wasting a second, over 100 aurora’s were once again seen after they confirmed the small enemy was still there.



However, the matchless lights of death which would normally eliminate everything, one after another is swallowed into the black star that was tossed around by Yue, or bent and reflected outwards towards the horizon, none of them reached her at all.



Yue used gravity magic to further increase her altitude. While being exposed to countless auroras, there is no unrest in her expression at all. “Exceeding Curse” was used to swallow up everything and “Cursed Sky” was used to move the ball of extreme gravity, as if it were a protection satellite orbiting and defending the moon.



[The breaths are uneffective, directly swat her down! Go!]



To Freed’s change of strategy, the ash dragons didn’t lag behind at all and followed the orders obediently. While releasing the roar of a dragon, murderous intent was shown in its eyes from wanting to tear up the slender girl with its sharp claws and teeth.



They intended to attack in waves. Yue’s environment was immediately buried under the gray crowd of ash dragons.



Yue who was being confronted didn’t worry at all at the incoming ash dragon’s murderous intent, she calmly closed her eyes. While deeply concentrating. It could be said that it was convenient for the ash dragons that she wasn’t moving, their claws expand, and their strong jaws spread open.



At the moment where they thought that it would be impossible to escape death, while facing them, Yue’s eyes opened up! And then, her lovely thin lips voiced out.



[“Beheading Threads*I think? ??*(cut)”]



At that moment, their world shifted in unison (. . .).



Like a mirror which had cracked, countless lines are drawn out in the open space, the lines were purposely made adjacent to the starting point. And then, the ash dragons which were coming in succession into the cracked space, after stiffening for an instant, fell to the ground while hearing the sound of their scattering and spraying blood from their cut body parts that came into contact with the broken space.



Space magic “Beheading Threads”. Through cracking space and moving it, it’s a no brainer that it’s a magic that will cut apart any object.



By Yue’s unseeable cutting magic, more than 30 ash dragons died without being able to do anything but scream out their last moments. Freed’s expression trembles from the activation of space magic, motion speed, and development scale that were far from what he could do.



[What great ability. ….By chance, are you one of the people chosen by God! If that’s so, then you’re rejection of my proposal is understandable]



Freed sweats a good amount while nodding in consent, Yue, [This misunderstanding imbecile, it’s extremely sickening though….], anyone could understand that she had an unpleasant expression.



[……What a joke. Whenever I fight, it’s always for Hajime’s sake. Don’t place me in the same group as you]



Towards the harsh words, Freed whose personality holds the gods in high esteem, love and respect, (he couldn’t imagine it) and became expressionless. It appears that mentioning that was taboo for Freed.



[Rejoice. I won’t be saying anymore than this. We’ll kill you and I will throw your corpse in front of that man. If I step on it, it may provoke some unrest. At that time, it would be that man’s end]



[….That mouth sure runs a lot. Can’t you just show it through your actions while being silent? Ugly man]



Towards the words that subdued his angry rant, multiple veins showed on Freed as he was ridiculed. Just as Yue had said, he decided to show it with actions.



But it was already seen at [Mountain of Great Flames], Freed issued instructions to a small bird-type demon that rode on his shoulder. Then, a part of the crowds of demons that had invaded and broke the outer wall of the Kingdom’s capital, surged towards Yue from the ground. It appears that they intend to attack from the ground.



Yue, while protecting herself from the ash dragon’s auroras with her gravity ball, summoned the “Thunder Dragon”. The golden dragon appeared from the dark clouds in the sky and let out a roar of lightning. It approached as the auroras from the ash dragons and Freed were being restrained by “Exceeding Curse”, the thunder dragon was then sent to wipe out the ground troops.



As usual, it was a no brainer that the thunder dragon’s mouth sucked in everything…..was what was supposed to happen, but the advance was stopped by 6 pairs of turtle-typed demon Abusodo*<-The demon-type’s name, maybe it means something? ????* that exceeded 5 meters in length. One of the huge Abusodos opened its big mouth and in reverse, actually started consuming the dragon instead.



Abusodo was also seen before with the Majinzoku woman named Cattleya at [Orcus Great Labyrinth], it’s a demon whose inherent magic is able to take in other magic into its body. However, the Abusodo that was consuming the thunder dragon on the ground was a different size from the Abusodo seen in the labyrinth. Most likely, it was improved and strengthened.



Still, as expected of the thunder dragon. Though it’s being swallowed by the Abusodo, with its large body, though slowly, it’s surely lifting it up. It appears that the limitation of only being able to swallow one type of magic hasn’t been changed yet. Even if the thunder is being swallowed, it cannot swallow the gravity magic.



The 6 Abusodos were gradually floating and they flailed around hastily, before their big bodies were carried off by the thunder dragon, another Abusodo began to swallow the gravity magic. As expected, the thunder dragon couldn’t endured the 2 strengthened Abusodo’s with their inherent magic “Magic Storing”, the body of the thunder dragon was consumed.



Immediately after that, the compressed magic was launched at Yue.



[…..Annoying]



Just like an anti-aircraft homing missile was launched from the ground, it accurately attacked Yue. Yue who was using the gravity ball to the best of her abilities to block the ash dragons and white dragon’s auroras, immediately evaded by “falling” from the sky.



[Fu~, I understood that you used strange thunder system magic. As long as Abusodo is here, your magic will be sealed off]



Freed laughs while grinning. However, Yue isn’t particularly worried, only quietly observing the Abusodos, only after a short time, her eyes wandered in the sky while thinking something and then concentrated on them again.



[Are you trying to tear space again? I won’t be giving you that kind of time!]



The white dragon and ash dragons further increased the severity of their attacks, a black panther typed demon approached by kicking off the ground and into the sky.



Although the storm of aurora’s were blocked by the gravity ball, most of Yue’s consciousness was used to construct another magic, her movements were lacking compared to before. There, the appearance of the black panther approached quickly from the ground, it began releasing countless tentacles*lol there always needs to be some kind of tentacle monster when against a girl*, furthermore, its sharp claws also bypassed the gravity ball which was focused on preventing the auroras from hitting.



Between offense and defense, countless wounds appear on Yue’s body, red blood splashes in the night sky. However, because it was only a flesh wound, it wasn’t much of a problem. To begin with what is Yue’s true defensive powers, certainly not barriers nor gravity balls. It was the cheating “Regeneration Power”.



A barrier would be placed if there was a companion, or evaded if the attack will cause clothes to tear because it would be a nuisance, originally she would just disregard the other parties attacks and leave it up to her regeneration powers, Yue’s true battle style was simply, one-sidedly attacking.



To Yue who was spraying blood, Freed’s expression was that of one who was convinced of their victory, when Yue’s wound was automatically restored, his eyes could only open widely in astonishment.



[Is that also an Age of God’s magic? Just exactly how many have you acquired!]



Although he wasn’t completely wrong, while voicing out his misunderstanding to Yue, he gave out orders for all demons to continue attacking until they beat her recovery rate. And then, Freed also started chanting an Age of God’s magic.



However, naturally, Yue was already concentrating on her magic previously. Yue’s eyes opened up and showed strength, in the space of the thundering roars and flashes, her lovely voice resounded.



[“Five Heavenly Dragons”]



Immediately afterwards, dark clouds appear and the thunder roared, the swirling wind turns into a storm and blew harshly, the water currents produced were frozen into ice, a gray cloud of sand took shape like a big snake, and flames strong enough to burn up the atmosphere were condensed.



As a result, the appearance of 5 demonic dragons were seen in the night sky of the Kingdom’s capital. Although they were dragons created from gravity magic, they all had their own respective attributes.



Gooaaaaaa~!!!



The 5 dragons roared out greatly enough to make the atmosphere tremble.



The group of gigantic demonic dragons looked divine, the ash dragons probably realized on instinct that they were greatly outmatched and leaked out a small miserable cry in their fright. In their eyes, there’s already little to no murderous intent towards Yue, instead fear and shock settled in its place, their eyes glanced over to their master Freed, demanding for help.



Freed once again exposed his disgraceful behavior of having his jaw drop down from the magic that lacked common sense while riding the white dragon. That chance wasn’t missed, Yue sent the 5 heavenly dragons to assault the ground troops.



The thunder dragon charged at Abusodo and swallowed it first, Abusodo put up a fight and opened its large mouth as well. Although the thunder dragon was slightly consumed, it was different from a while ago, the blue*<-I think this is supposed to actually be the flame one but no matter what i do, i get blue lol, ??* dragon dashed out from behind the thunder dragon, when they both collided together, Abusodo melted due to the intense heat.



[Kuaaaaaan~!!]



The pain generated from its shell melting down while still alive caused Abusodo to cry out painfully as its inherent magic was completely bested, the thunder dragon then aimed at another target. It was, another Abusodo that was swallowed by the storm dragon. While letting out a godly roar, it bit into the other dragon where Abusodo was, the edge of its body transformed into ash from being scorched.



Again at a nearby place, the ice dragon is freezing Abusodo and the stone dragon rolled up and caused all surrounding areas to petrify. The storm dragon which was freed by the thunder dragon, advanced onwards and cut the demons such as the black panthers besides Abusodo into pieces.



As expected, using the 5 heavenly dragons was harsh, Yue was panting and her forehead was drenched in sweat. After quickly disposing of the Abusodos, her next target were the ash dragons in the sky.



Freed’s group of matchless dragons were similarly challenged by Yue and her dragons. Without a doubt the figures of the ash dragons becoming food to the 5 heavenly dragons could be seen, this seemed to just show the difference in ability between Yue and Freed.



Freed finally realized after coming this far. The shape of a terrible monster which would normally be avoided. It was not just the boy who took heavy damage from the surprise attack at [Mountain of Great Flames], but also the girl in front of his eyes, she was without a doubt someone that he had to risk his life against when fighting.



He was ashamed at himself for becoming arrogant for saying what he had said before the fight.



Therefore, this next magic attack is literally with all of Freed’s energy put into it.



[——————World which is always swaying, giant’s iron hammer, roar of the dragons, Army of trampling legs, both worlds are never met, hearing rumbles, bringing screams, It’s God’s sigh! It’s God’s grief! Thou, be crushed with despair! “Trembling Heaven”!]



The surrounding space rumbles intensely. Sounding lower than a hungry bellies groan, as if the world itself was screaming.



Yue’s thoughts, [Mu~!] her cautiousness intensifies as she has knowledge of this magic, a defensive system was immediately thought up. The range of the blast magic was far too wide to evade in time. And all average defenses would be completely broken in an instant.



After canceling the 5 heavenly dragons and the gravity ball, she immediately constructed space magic. This is because she has no room to spare resources on other magics. Yue with the quick use of space magic and simultaneously, the space shrunk momentarily and caused a great explosion.



Space itself exploded. Without a doubt, it was had great force, even the leftover ground troops and ash dragons were obliterated in an instant, it gouged out the earth and even blew away all clouds within the area.



Space magic “Trembling Heaven”. Space is forcefully compressed, it’s a magic that generates an extremely powerful impact from letting loose the compressed space.



[…..N~, as expected….of Age of God’s magic]



However, Yue had survived even though she was at the center of the impact. Her clothes were torn in some places, blood dripped from her mouth, some of her internal organs were probably damaged, however it was all too light compared to the impact that went off.



Her slight injuries were also quickly healed.



Normally, it had enough power to completely wipe out everything without a trace……



The reason was because Yue had used the space magic “Restraining Threads*I think? ??*” before “Trembling Heaven” activated. This was a magic that restores space. In use, it was an convenient magic that could be used for defense and restraining. More so, it’s magic consumption wasn’t at the point of wanting to tear out the whites of ones own eyes out.



The space wasn’t completely restored because it was instantaneously created, though Yue took some damage, other than physical restoration from “Automatic Reproduction”, her clothes were also restored through reproduction magic, her appearance in both the inside and outside were flawless.



At the center of where everything in the surroundings were destroyed, a figure was seen bathing in the moonlight as if nothing had happened at all, it was an amazing combination of divineness and strength.



However, there was one person who didn’t doubt Yue’s strength. He assaulted Yue from a blind spot.



[I knew you would withstand it! Monster disguised as a girl!]



Passing through the gate behind Yue, Freed who rode on the white dragon appeared while shooting out an aurora.



Though Yue evaded the aurora by immediately “falling”, she could not dodge the white dragon’s opened mouth as they intersected, it tried to devour her arm from the shoulder down in one go.



Bushu~! blood gushes out from the wound. The white dragon was unable to completely tear off Yue’s arm, when its sharp fangs sank down onto her soft skin, it tried to shoot out an aurora at point blank.



It seemed to be improvised as Freed continuously shot out great magics, this time he was once again convinced of his victory, he turned to look at Yue in delight. However, the moment he saw Yue’s expression, an unspeakable chill ran through Freed’s spine, his eyes full of delight turned into fear.



Because, on Yue’s lips was a smile in the shape of a perfect crescent moon. Her thin pink lips easily stood out. The smile no longer showed the divineness that was shown awhile ago. The moonlight which shined on Yue, changed into one not of solemnity, but one of devilishness.



Through the night wind, deep red eyes shining brightly between the gaps of her beautiful gold hair could be seen.



In other words



——-You touched me?



and.



The chant of the Age of God’s magic was quietly voiced from Yue’s mouth.



[“Destruction Engraving”*I think? ??*]



Immediately afterwards, in the night sky where the devilish moonlight pours down, the scream of two were simultaneously heard.



[Guuaaaaa~!!]



Kuuruaaan~!!



The white dragon writhed from the impact, this time Yue’s arm was completely torn off, However, she didn’t have an anxious expression and manipulated gravity magic to go up into the sky. And, in an instant, the appearance of the missing arm returned, she then glared at Freed and the white dragon that was in agony while gushing blood from their whole bodies.



[……How is it? The same wounds that Hajime received. Does it hurt?]



[Guuu~! Damn you, this…..]



To Yue who was expressionless and shouldering the moon on her back, Freed grit his teeth in fierce pain and glared sharply back.



Freed and the white dragon’s states were severe. The white dragon suffered a hollowed chest through combustion, in addition it was bleeding throughout its entire body, it seemed that it would crash at any moment. As for Freed, he was bleeding slowly from an incision wound on his chest, his left arm was broken and lowered lifelessly, and he was coughing out blood intensely as his internal organs were damaged. In addition there were big and small wounds throughout his whole body.



All of the wounds were the same as the time where Hajime was injured at [Mountain of Great Flames]. Reproduction magic “Destruction Engraving”——–a magic that reproduces the wounds and destruction that an object once received in the past. Although not direct nor indirect, if it’s not touched within a radius of less than 3 meters it wouldn’t work, the wounds that can be reproduced is proportional to the magic power being used.



Yue if possible, wanted to corner Freed with this magic. This fight was personal revenge from Yue to the end. At the [Mountain of Great Flames], her lover was greatly injured and anger took root in her heart, unable to escape unless revenge was carried out. Since then, [……The next time we meet, I’ll definitely beat the hell out of him], she promised.



And when she obtained the reproduction magic at [Merujine*pronounced Merujeene* Undersea Ruins], while remembering the events at [Mountain of Great Flames], now that she could, she intended to use “Destruction Engraving” on him. Yue’s “Yan*as in Yandere*” whispered out so there was no helping it.



However, Yue was weak in close combat. it would be futile as she wouldn’t be able to activate the magic in time before Freed and his white dragon which flew away at high speeds before they could touch. Therefore, she thought she’d have to substantially damage the enemy before she could use it but…..Freed and them purposely touched her instead. There was no helping it that she unintentionally leaked out a smile. To Hajime’s enemies, her mind cannot stop the “Yan Yan”.



[……The me right now…..does it mean I wasn’t chosen to be the victor this day. …….I was unprepared*I think, something about his resolution*]



[……I wouldn’t let you]



Freed guessed that it was checkmate and grits his teeth, at the time when Yue was about to deal the finishing blow, waves of attack magic that shot from the ground were aimed at Yue.



[Freed-sama! Please pull out at once!]



[We will buy time!]



They were the ground troops that had gone to invade the Kingdom’s capital. They seemed to have guessed that Freed was in a predicament and came to rescue him.



[You guys! ….Ku, sorry!]



The Majinzoku’s that came to the rescue, after seeing Freed and the white dragon covered in wounds, their eyes borne hatred, they carried out suicide attacks without thinking about defending at all. Naturally, there’s no way they could kill Yue with just enthusiasm. However, it seems that the very limited time earned was enough for Freed to open a gate.



Immediately before the flame spear that Yue shot could pierce Freed and his white dragon, they both jumped into the gate and disappeared.



[…..Obstructed]



Yue after Freed successfully ran away, still, [You dare do that to Freed-sama!], coldly looked down at the Majinzoku who attacked repeatedly while yelling the same thing, the space magic “Trembling Heaven” that Freed used awhile ago was used once again. Although Yue completely annihilated their snarling feelings in an instant, you could see some irritation on her expression. Her pent-up anger wasn’t cleared.



While Yue was taking deep breaths to calm herself, an unbecoming bright voice resounded on the battlefield.



[Yue-sa~n! Is that guy still alive? If he’s alive, let me hit him once……uwa~a what happened here? Was there a natural disaster?]



Shia’s usamimi’s*<-rabbit ears* waved as she jumped to the floating disk and asked while looking at the surroundings with an amazed voice.



[…..Fled]



Shia understood roughly what went on from that single phrase, while being slightly surprised at Freed’s unexpected tenacity, she soothed Yue with a wry smile.



And while waiting to replenish their magical powers, they exchanged their information, then an explosion occurred in the corner of the royal palace, following that, a huge pillar of light poured down from the sky, an impossible scene of the large army of demons consisting of tens of thousands that were outside of the outer walls were completely obliterated, then they looked at one another.



[ [……Hajime (San)] ]



The two answered at the exact same time.



[……For the time being, should we go to the royal palace?]



[……N] Shia and Yue concluded that the perpetrator of the lack of commonsense was Hajime, they smiled as they glanced at the huge crater where the demons had vanished, together, the two went to the royal palace where Hajime would be.





Chapter 102




Silver wings fluttered under the moonlight.



However, it was not to fly. It was to shoot out magic bullets made out of silver feathers which leaked out murderous intent from the silver wings. The magic bullets of silver held terrifying power along with the ability to continuously fire at will, the darkness was torn up in the sky 8,000 meters above ground, and a great number of flashes of light pours onto it’s target.



What stood up against it was a steel weapon which sparked out bright red light. Everytime the monster who crushed all his foes released a roar, the silver feathers that came flying in would scatter tragically and disperse. Although they were well calculated trajectory shots, it’s meaningless if they all get knocked down in one blow, a hole was created in the barrage which could be mistaken as a wall. What was needed was the courage to progress. That was how the perfect evasion was carried out.



[Hiyaa~!]



An out of place lovely voice resounded from the situation which gambled their lives. It was Hatanaka Aiko-sensei who couldn’t endure any longer and released an improper voice. Hajime used Metsurai*his machinegun* to shoot down the large barrage of silver feathers that “God’s Apostle” Nointo shot, Aiko was being held by his right arm and he continued to dodge at the very last second. She experienced her first dogfight in her life (Flesh and Blood version).



[Sensei! Keep your mouth closed! You’ll bleed like crazy if you bite yourself!]



[Even if you tell me tha-aa!? I, I bit myself……]



Hajime’s advice was in vain, Aiko immediately had tears in her eyes. Actually no, she already had tears in her eyes at the start of the air battle, so it wasn’t only because she bit herself.



Hajime as well, because Aiko doesn’t particularly have high physical strength, in order to avoid using intense movements he used “Light Speed*remember he uses it to slow down time and accelerate his thinking process*”, he knocked down the oncoming barrage and dodged with minimum movements, however the movements were still more intense than a roller coaster, Aiko was already in a groggy state.



However he couldn’t just go ahead and toss her away either. Nointo’s merciless attack gave no room for Hajime who was holding Aiko to do that, plus as soon as he threw her, the attacks would likely be aimed at Aiko. Fighting with Aiko behind him could work, however moving together while holding her would be the better choice.



Besides, this situation won’t be continuing forever. A reliable companion should be coming to their rescue soon. Hajime used Schlag to shoot down the silver feathers which surrounded them from all directions while evading, Hajime spoke to Aiko who had shut her eyes tightly and was clinging tightly onto him.



[Sensei, hold on for just a bit longer. Right now my companion is heading here. When that fellow gets here, you’ll be able to get to the ground]



[Al, alright! But, what about you!?]



[Of course, I’m gonna kill that arrogant person]



[U~u, I’m sorry for holding you back….]



While grinding her teeth, she was aware that she was literally extra baggage. Hajime embraced Aiko closely and performed a somersault. In the inverted world, the silver bombardment passed over Hajime’s head. The flash of light erased the upper part of the isolation tower which Aiko had previously been held captive.



Again, a shriek was let out, however it was drowned out by the shockwaves, while pressed onto Hajime’s chest, his heartbeat could be heard and wasn’t erratic at all, Aiko understood and obtained a strange sense of security from hearing it. Really, what am I thinking about in this situation, she rebutted herself however she gave in and clung onto Hajime with even more strength.



[Don’t worry about it. I’ve expected an unreasonable situation since the beginning]



[! Wa, you’d go that far……just for me…..]



Of course, Hajime meant that in the sense of colliding against the church for the Age of God’s magic, not in the sense of helping Aiko…..Just that, Aiko who was drunk from the situation splendidly misunderstood its meaning. And, in a situation where she was being embraced and protected further increased her misunderstanding. It’s necessary that she wake up quickly.



[…….So you still have room to talk, irregular]



[Nuguo~o!?]



Immediately after the exchange of silver bombardments and barrage of silver feathers, a mechanically cold voice sounded out within striking distance of Hajime’s side. At once, he used his artificial arm to shoot out behind himself from the elbow, he also used the recoil to turn himself around. What jumped into his eyes was, one large sword used to defend the attack, and the other large sword was swung sideways. The large sword was 2 meters in length, 30 centimeters in width, and cladded in silver light, just being there was enough to make you feel a sense of overwhelming intimidation being released from it. And, its ability that it bears is also quite merciless. After all, it was clad in the silver inherent magic “Decomposition” that Nointo used. It would be against the rules to even touch it.



However, even if he knew that, he couldn’t perform any unreasonable movements because Aiko was still there, Hajime immediately used Schlag to hit the center of the large sword to divert its trajectory and allowed himself to fall back backwards, with that he just barely managed to dodge it. The large sword passed by and grazed his bangs which caused him to break out in cold sweat.



He instantaneously used his artificial arm, Schlag, and “Vajra”, the azanthium managed to hold off against the “Decomposition” but, it’s inevitable that it would take damage every time they came into contact. This time around, Schalg’s surface was scraped down slightly. If the same thing is done over and over again, it’ll probably be destroyed quite fast.



Nointo didn’t stop the centrifugal force caused by the large sword, while rotating the moonlight was reflected and caused her silver hair to glitter beautifully, she then turned to Hajime and brought down her sword that she used to block the bullets. With immense power the speed of the sword already far exceeded the commonsense of its large frame.



Once again, Hajime shot out a shell from his artificial arm to fend off the large sword and used it’s recoil to rotate, he then pointed Schlag’s muzzle at Nointo and pulled the trigger 3 times. Three flashes of light roared out as they headed towards Nointo’s heart, he accurately shot them towards her abdomen.



However, Nointo’s reaction speed wasn’t normal either. She had already held up her large sword to protect her stomach the moment Hajime aimed his gun.



Hajime then used the cross bitt’s to pursue Nointo who was distanced due to the power of the railguns. The loaded exploding slug bullets gave out a wave of bright red ripples in the night sky and a created a terrifying shockwave. Although Nointo managed to easily negate it with her silver wings, just as Hajime planned it out, they were distanced from one another.



[Hawa, hawawa…..what, how did….]



[…..Sensei. I’m begging you, while we’re still trying to kill each other please don’t release such cute sounds. It’s like it’ll ruin the mood?]



[C, cute….Nagumo-kun! Wh, what are you saying to your sensei…..]



They were in a super high grade battle where victory or defeat could be settled in the matter of seconds, however Aiko’s cute screams would be heard in intervals, Hajime’s vigor was being cut down each time. [You’re surprisingly comfortable while being protected?*I think? ?????????????????*] was said while looking at them suspiciously, actually half of that was correct, Aiko had never thought in her wildest dreams that she would feel so secure while being embraced by Hajime.



[…..Even while holding extra baggage, in order to overpower you…..as expected, you are too strong. You’re not a suitable piece for my masters]



[Well, im glad. Finally aggravating the Neets, being called an unneeded nuisance and unqualified piece is of the highest evaluation. Thanks a lot]



[……..It’s useless if you’re trying to make me angry. I have no emotions]



[Ha? What are you saying? Those were obviously my real feelings]



[…………]



Nointo expanded her wings and steeled her eyes then posed her twin swords in a cross. As she said, there really were no feelings, was it just a useless conversation then…..in Hajime’s eyes, some anger began to swell up, his useless thoughts were then omitted immediately. Anyhow, he’ll still kill her. No matter what he thinks of Nointo, in the end it’s a trivial thing.



Nointo’s silver wings began to flutter again, the silver feathers were released and scattered in the sky. However, this time it wasn’t shot at Hajime. Instead, they gathered around Nointo in an instant, several silver feathers were piled up on top and overlapping each other. Right, it was a magic formation. The magic formation glowed out silver lights and Nointo glared at Hajime.



And…..



[“Disastrous Flame Wave”*I think? ???*]



The magic that was used created a huge tsunami of fire that scorched up the sky.



It appears that she was able to not only use magic bullets, but also attribute magic. Though she’s never used it up till now, it was because she judged that silver magic bullets would be enough. In other words, she’s become serious.



The huge wave of flames raised up and down and completely towered over their heads, towards the extraordinary waves of flames, Aiko momentarily sees an illusion that the world was engulfed in great flames. She glanced up at Hajime from his chest, he was searching desperately for something and sweat could be seen on his cheeks.



What Hajime was looking for was the core of the magic. If he can find it with his Magic Eye, he can make the whole thing disappear as long as he shoots through it. Of course, it would take god-like pin-point accuracy to shoot through a needle-like hole, but for Hajime it was already a normal skill.



However, the magic that Nointo used was a super-wide-ranged magic, it was large enough to completely illuminate [Kamiyama] which could be comparable to daytime. It was like searching for a needle in an ocean, the position of the core was unknown.



And, the time limit ended without mercy.



The tsunami of flames that reached several hundred meters completely swallowed Hajime and Aiko without letting them escape. It was checkmate no matter how anyone looks at it. It would be normal to assume that the 2 people were completely burnt down and left no traces at all.



However, Nointo didn’t look away from the center of the great flames that burned brightly.



[…….Will you also surpass this]



Immediately after Nointo muttered that, the attacks effects ended, at the center of the great flames, Hajime and Aiko were flawlessly enclosed by 4 cross bitts.



With Hajime and Aiko at the center, the 4 cross bitts created a triangular pyramid and connected with one another through wires. A film of bright red light stretched in between the field where the wires connected.



[It’s still only in its experimental stage but…..it seems to have worked quite well]



[Th, this is…..]



Hajime’s slightly relieved expression could be seen. This was possible because the wire and ore’s which carried space magic through generation magic were built into the cross bitts, when four points were united a boxed-type barrier would be formed. It’s not just a simple barrier though, it’s the type that shuts out space itself, theoretically, its defensive powers were guaranteed. However, it was still in the experimental stages, because there was no solid proof on how much it could actually endure, Hajime was slightly uneasy for a moment.



Nointo looked at the barrier in amazement and saw Aiko who was still embraced being restless, once again she formed another magic formation.



But, there were more than 20 magic formations this time, their forms unfolded as silver feathers were shot towards Hajime simultaneously.



It was exactly like an attack of angry waves. Most likely, although the four point barrier might demonstrate considerable strength, it would be a problem for those inside of it to be caged in. moreover, it’s uncertain if it could endure Nointo’s waves of all out attacks.



The bad side of this barrier was that Hajime could not attack while enclosed because space itself is cut off. Therefore, Hajime quickly released the barrier and distanced himself greatly away from Nointo, he tried to devote himself to evading until Teio arrived.



Then suddenly at that time, a song began to resound throughout [Kamiyama].



Hajime looked at where the singing was coming from as he dodged the silver feathers, there, he saw a gathering of church priests, their hands were crossed in a prayer pose and they continued singing. The chorus consisted of 100 priests gave out a solemnity feel to it, just like those that you’d be able to see at Earth.



Just what, immediately after Hajime questioned himself,



[….~!? What’s this? My body is…..]



[Nagumo-kun!? Au~, wh, what is this……]



Hajime and Aiko’s bodies felt weird.



Strength couldn’t be found in their bodies and their magic powers were quickly diminishing. It was as if all their energy were being sapped out of their bodies. Moreover, particles of light began to cling on them and their movements became more obstructed.



[Ku, a magic that causes an abnormal state…..as expected of the head temple. Their measures against enemies are perfect]



Hajime’s guess was right on target.



Ishtar and them noticed that Nointo, “God’s True Apostle”, was fighting and supported her with the “Hymn of Supreme Degeneration*I think? ?????*” magic. This was a brutal magic which weakened the enemies and restrains them as well, it was an irregular magic which could only be sustained if continuously sanged by multiple priests at once.



[Ishtar huh. ……He seems to understand his duties well. Quite a good piece]



Ishtar was looking at Nointo with an ecstatic expression from the ground and Nointo looked back at him with eyes that showed no feelings. If you looked at Ishtar’s expression, you’d know right away that he wished to cooperate with Nointo and it seemed to also be the height of his lifetime. Certainly, it was a convenient existence that moved along with God’s will.



Ishtar and the other priests aside, currently, the magic invoked was definitely a troublesome one.



Hajime gradually lost his powers, while supplementing it with his huge magical powers, he managed to dodge Nointo’s attack. However, it was obvious that his reaction time was cut down drastically. And while continuing on with that body state, Nointo’s attacks weren’t letting up at all.



Several magic formations formed around Nointo and lightning bolts came dashing out, it rushed towards Hajime while drawing irregular movements in the sky. Hajime shot through the lightning bolts core with Schlag and they dispersed, however he couldn’t get rid of the electrified air caused by the lightning bolts and they got shocked a little.



Momentary stiffness. However, that was a fatal chance against Nointo.



[~!?]



Nointo moved in at super-speeds and crossed her twin swords together. Due to the momentary stiffness from the electric shock, Hajime’s reaction was slightly delayed, he somehow managed to divert a blow away using Schlag but the second blade couldn’t be avoided and it sanked into his shoulder.



[Guu~u!]



While raising a painful voice, he flipped his body by using the outburst from his artificial arm, while using “Aerodynamic” he desperately attempted to get outside of Nointo’s sword range. Naturally, her severe sword attacks didn’t allow him to have that much free time, he made the cross bitts self-destruct and managed to distance himself away from her.



[Nagumo-kun~!?]



[I’m alright so be quiet!]



Blood dripped down from Hajime’s shoulder and onto Aiko’s cheeks. From the shockwave that the cross bitts created, “Vajra” was used to defend themselves, although Aiko didn’t get hit much by the impact, she desperately tried to keep her consciousness and raised a worried scream towards Hajime.



But, Hajime no longer had time to worry about Aiko. While replying coldly, Nointo began to shoot out silver feathers. Hajime used “Vajra”, “Air Claw”, and Schlag to bring them down. Because of the particles of light, his body felt sluggish, it wasn’t possible to evade everything after all.



Towards that kind of Hajime, Nointo charged forwards from the front…..was a feint and spread her silver wings! a light was emitted. The bright lights blinded Hajime’s sights.



However, Hajime’s perception ability was first class. Immediately, he felt Nointo’s presence behind him and turned Schlag around and rapidly fired. Consecutive explosions were heard, turning around…..he saw a bundle of silver feathers scattering around. Right, it was a decoy that Nointo made with a bundle of her silver feathers.



[~!?]



Hajime’s spine stood up straight. His instincts were ringing out loudly, warning him. Hajime regretted that he had turned around, he could only pull the trigger without properly aiming with his arm backwards.



Bullets were shot, and luckily enough it flew towards Nointo’s head, but she easily evaded by ducking her head. And, one of the large swords cut down onto Hajime’s back. Hajime used the derivation of “Vajra” which was “Intensive Strengthening*I think? ????*” to the best of his abilities, he steeled himself in preparation.



Although Nointo’s large sword was equal to Hajime’s “Vajra” for an instant, the wall was immediately torn apart, the swords tip swung down onto Hajime’s body.



[Gaa~a!!]



[Nagumo-kun!]



He felt pain burning on his back, Towards Hajime who instinctively leaked out his voice, Aiko’s expression and voice were impatient. However, Hajime countered Nointo by somersaulting forwards from using the impact of the cut.



Nointo immediately pursues them with her sword held high.



Hajime whose body was sluggish placed “Vajra” onto a cross bitt to make it into a shield, other cross bitts were sent to the left and right of Nointo and released their built-in exploding bullets.



As Nointo rushes in she used her silver wings to brush off the bullets from the cross bitts, and used her large sword to cut down the cross bitt acting as Hajime’s shield, furthermore, she flung her second sword onto the first one in order to devour the cross bitt, it easily cut through.



Hajime’s eyes were opened wide, Nointo’s eyes were literally right in front of his. Her eyes showed clearly that this was their difference. In other words, “This is the end”.



Hajime’s eyes showed no sign of giving up. However, in order to not let Aiko die in this situation, he needed to consider things. If it comes to it, Hajime decided that he would get hurt instead. In such cases, if he became too weakened, he’d have to regrettably use “Limit Breakthrough” without waiting for Teio to arrive, he prepared himself to sacrifice his left arm first.



And, against Nointo’s large sword, Hajime’s held up artificial left arm was torn into, the moment when it was about to break through and deal a fatal injury,



Guugaa~aaaaaaa!!!



Along with a dragons roar a black flash approached from beneath them with terrific power. It was a scorching breath which eliminates everything. The violent black storm was accurately aimed at Nointo.



Immediately, Nointo’s silver wings wrapped around her body in a defensive stance.



Just after that, the black breath directly hit Nointo’s wings, although it was being decomposed the force of the blow pushed her away. The black and silver magics collide with one another and caused black-silver magical powers to scatter in the air, Nointo was flung backwards into one of the churches towers. With the sound of the impact, the tower began rattling and crumbled down.



The screams of the priests led by Ishtar could be heard from underneath. They seemed to be upset because an apostle of God was blown off.



Hajime took out Orkan*his rocket launcher* from the “Treasure Warehouse” and without looking he shot all 12 rockets towards Ishtar’s group. This time around he ignored the different kind of screams being heard. Because another voice echoed and drowned out theirs.



“Master. Are you alright?”



Towards the voice, Hajime’s cheeks loosen up although he’s still on the lookout for Nointo. The arrival of the dragon that he was waiting for came.



